South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3024.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 44-36-330 (B) and (C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) The House Ways and Means Committee and the Senate Finance Committee may designate one representative from each respective body to the advisory council. (B)(C) Members of the advisory council are not entitled to mileage, per diem, subsistence, or any other form of compensation. (C)(D) The advisory council shall maintain and update a statewide plan to address Alzheimer's disease and related dementias.  The plan must be updated every five years. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----